Utah statutes.
31A-22-103.   Validity of surety bonds.
(1)  An undertaking to stand as surety which is issued by an insurer
authorized to do a surety business in this state is complete compliance with
any qualification requirement in Utah law respecting surety bonds.  This
undertaking is acceptable to any state official or court-appointed fiduciary
authorized to receive or empowered to require the undertaking.  A copy of a
surety's certificate of authority, certified by the commissioner, is prima
facie evidence that a surety was authorized to do business in this state on
the date of the certificate.
(2)  No instrument executed by an insurer authorized to do a surety business
is ineffective because of the insurer's failure to attach a copy of its
certificate of authority to do business in this state.  However, a public
official or court-appointed fiduciary may, by prior written request, require
that a copy of the insurer's certificate of authority, certified by the
commissioner, be delivered.  The insurer's failure to deliver a certified copy
of the surety's certificate of authority within ten days of receipt of the
request is adequate grounds for refusing to accept the suretyship instrument.
Failure to request a copy of the certificate of authority prior to accepting
the surety instrument is a waiver of the right to request the certificate.
(3)  After executing an obligation of suretyship, no insurer may deny its
corporate power to execute that type of instrument or to incur that type of
liability in any proceeding against the insurer upon that instrument.
